Utah statutes.
13-37-203.   Liability.

(1)  A person may bring an action against a commercial entity in a court of competent jurisdiction in this state if:

(a)  the commercial entity enters into a consumer transaction with that person;

(b)  as a result of the consumer transaction described in Subsection (1)(a), the commercial entity obtains nonpublic personal information concerning that person; and

(c)  the commercial entity violates this chapter.

(2)  In an action brought under Subsection (1), a commercial entity that violates this chapter is liable to the person who brings the action for:

(a)  $500 for each time the commercial entity fails to provide the notice required by this section in relation to the nonpublic personal information of the person who brings the action; and

(b)  court costs.

(3)  A person may not bring a class action under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 97, 2003 General Session

